Louisiana, session 2026, HB1136.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1116 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1116. Use of petroleum pipeline right-of-way prohibited
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no pipeline
transporting carbon dioxide for sequestration shall be located in the same right-of-
way as any pipeline transporting petroleum products.